Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 2. Ancillary Administration

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

31 Am. Jur. 2d Executors and Administrators §§ 1057 to 1071, 1073 to 1094; 80 Am. Jur. 2d Wills § 753; 80 Am. Jur. 2d Wills §§ 916 to 919.

34 C.J.S. Executors and Administrators §§ 915 to 934.

§ 2-11-201.
Probate of estates of nonresidents.

In case of a nonresident’s estate having property in this state not exceeding in value the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00), which estate has been duly probated and settled in another state, the probate of the estate in this state may be dispensed with upon filing with the district judge in the proper county a petition under oath showing the facts in the case together with certified copies of the petition, order of appointment of executor or administrator, inventory and final decree of distribution of estate therein, and a full showing that debts of the estate have been paid and the district judge giving notice by publication for the period of three (3) weeks of the intention of the petitioner to have the probate proceedings admitted in this state as a probate of the estate. If on the day set for hearing the petition no objection is made, the judge shall make an order admitting the certified copies of the proceedings in the estate to record in his court and they shall be considered and treated from that time as original proceedings in his court and shall be conclusive evidence of the facts therein shown. If at such hearing any creditor objects to the proceedings and shows that the decedent is indebted to him, his claim not having been presented in the original state, the matter shall be postponed and the creditor or other person shall be allowed to petition for letters of administration as in other cases. This section shall not be construed to prevent the courts of this state from appointing a temporary administrator in this state to collect and preserve the property of the estate of the deceased person which may be located in this state.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 31, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 6746; R.S. 1931, § 88-918; C.S. 1945, § 6-2328; W.S. 1957, § 2-329; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-601; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1991, ch. 98, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 60, § 2; 2013 ch. 166, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00)” for “one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00).”

Laws 2013, ch. 166, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

Interpretation of out-of-state order.—

District court properly granted summary judgment to an oil and gas producer on the issue of ownership of a testator's overriding royalty interest (ORRI) because admission of the California probate order, which did not contain a description of the ORRI, meant that the ORRI was distributed via the residuary clause. Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

District court properly granted summary judgment to an oil and gas producer on the issue of ownership of a testator’s overriding royalty interest (ORRI) because admission of the California probate order, which did not contain a description of the ORRI, meant that the ORRI was distributed via the residuary clause. Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied

in

Hawks v. Creswell, 60 Wyo. 1, 144 P.2d 129,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1943).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of rule permitting courts to exercise jurisdiction over equity actions against foreign personal representatives to actions for accounting where there are assets within forum, 53 ALR2d 331.

§ 2-11-202.
Nonresident property in Wyoming; disposition.

In case of a nonresident’s estate having property in this state not exceeding in value the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00), which estate is being duly probated and settled in another state, the Wyoming district judge may enter an order for the sale of the property located in this state provided:

The petitioner files with the district judge in the proper county a petition under oath showing the facts in the case together with certified copies of the petition, order of appointment of executor or administrator, notice to creditors showing that the time for filing claims has expired, and inventory of the Wyoming estate;

The petitioner files a certified copy of an order authorizing sale or other disposition of Wyoming property issued by the court having jurisdiction over the estate being probated in another state;

The district judge gives notice by publication for three (3) weeks of the intention of the petitioner to have the property located in this state subject to sale or other disposition; and

If on the day set for hearing the petition no objection is made, the judge shall make an order admitting the certified copies of the proceedings in the estate and the order authorizing sale or other disposition of Wyoming property to record in his court and they shall be considered and treated from that time as original proceedings in his court and shall be conclusive evidence of the facts therein shown.

If on the day set for hearing the petition any creditor objects to the sale or other disposition of the Wyoming property, his claim not having been presented in the original state, the matter shall be postponed and the petition denied. This section shall not be construed to prevent the courts of this state from appointing a temporary administrator in this state to collect and preserve the property of the estate of the deceased person which may be located in this state.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 166, § 1, effective March 13, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00)” for “one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00)” in (a).

Laws 2013, ch. 166, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.